California statutes. Elections Code
0313.02--the following census blocks:

2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3015, 3016

0610.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21412.

Congressional District 12 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 12

ALAMEDA

Whole Tracts in Alameda County

4001.00, 4002.00, 4003.00, 4004.00, 4005.00, 4006.00, 4007.00, 4008.00, 4009.00, 4010.00, 4011.00, 4012.00, 4013.00, 4014.00, 4015.00, 4016.00, 4017.00, 4018.00, 4022.00, 4024.00, 4025.00, 4026.00, 4027.00, 4028.01, 4028.02, 4029.00, 4030.00, 4031.00, 4033.01, 4033.02, 4034.01, 4034.02, 4035.01, 4035.02, 4036.00, 4037.01, 4037.02, 4038.00, 4039.00, 4040.00, 4041.01, 4041.02, 4042.00, 4043.00, 4044.00, 4045.01, 4045.02, 4046.00, 4047.00, 4048.00, 4049.00, 4050.00, 4051.00, 4052.00, 4053.01, 4053.02, 4054.01, 4054.02, 4055.00,
 4056.00, 4057.00, 4058.00, 4059.01, 4059.02, 4060.00, 4061.00, 4062.01, 4062.02, 4063.00, 4064.00, 4065.00, 4066.01, 4066.02, 4067.00, 4068.00, 4069.00, 4070.00, 4071.01, 4071.02, 4072.00, 4073.00, 4074.00, 4075.00, 4076.00, 4077.00, 4078.00, 4079.00, 4080.00, 4081.00, 4082.00, 4083.00, 4084.00, 4085.00, 4086.00, 4087.00, 4088.00, 4089.00, 4090.00, 4091.00, 4092.00, 4093.00, 4094.00, 4095.00, 4096.00, 4097.00, 4098.00, 4099.00, 4100.00, 4101.00, 4102.00, 4103.00, 4104.00, 4105.00, 4201.00, 4202.00, 4203.01, 4203.02, 4204.01, 4204.02, 4205.00, 4206.00, 4211.00, 4212.00, 4213.00, 4214.00, 4215.00, 4216.00, 4217.00, 4218.00, 4219.00, 4220.00, 4221.00, 4222.00, 4223.00, 4224.00, 4225.00, 4227.00, 4228.00, 4229.01, 4229.02, 4230.00, 4231.00, 4232.00, 4233.00, 4234.00, 4235.00, 4236.01, 4236.02, 4237.00, 4238.00, 4239.01, 4239.02, 4240.01, 4240.02, 4251.01, 4251.02, 4251.03, 4251.04, 4261.00, 4262.00, 4271.00, 4272.00, 4273.00, 4276.00, 4277.00, 4278.00, 4279.00, 4280.00, 4281.00, 4282.00, 4283.01, 4283.02,
 4284.00, 4285.00, 4286.00, 4287.00, 4321.00, 4322.00, 4323.00, 4324.00, 4325.01, 4325.02, 4326.01, 4326.02, 4327.00, 4330.00, 4331.03, 4331.04, 9819.00, 9820.00, 9821.00, 9832.00

Partial Tracts in Alameda County

4328.00--the following census blocks:

1011, 2005, 2012, 3009

4331.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2015

4332.00--the following census blocks:

4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027,
 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032

4333.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014

4334.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001,
 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4012, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6009, 6010, 6011, 6012, 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016, 6017, 6018, 6019, 6020

4335.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

4336.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007

4338.02--the following census blocks:

1003

9900.00--the following census blocks:

0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006, 0009, 0010, 0011

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21413.

Congressional District 13 consists of the following:

Whole Counties in Congressional District 13

MERCED

Partial Counties in Congressional District 13

FRESNO

Whole Tracts in Fresno County

0083.01, 0083.03, 0084.03, 0084.04, 0084.05

Partial Tracts in Fresno County

0039.00--the following census blocks:

2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022

0083.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1148, 1151, 1152, 1166, 1169, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1183, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009,
 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024

0084.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122,
 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2140, 2141

MADERA

Whole Tracts in Madera County

0005.10, 0005.11, 0006.02, 0008.01, 0008.02, 0009.01, 0009.02, 0009.03

Partial Tracts in Madera County

0002.01--the following census blocks:

1080, 1083, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1093

0002.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052,
 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2063, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2081, 2082, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111

0002.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008,
 2009, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2029, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2044, 3005

0003.01--the following census blocks:

1009

0003.02--the following census blocks:

2001, 2010, 5001

0005.06--the following census blocks:

1014, 1015, 2038

0005.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 2008, 2009, 2010

0005.13--the following
 census blocks:

1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 3000, 3019

0005.14--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4028

0005.15--the following census blocks:

1019, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031

0005.17--the following census blocks:

1038, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1052, 1053

0005.18--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1018, 2006, 2007, 2008

0006.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

0006.04--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000,
 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019

0007.02--the following census blocks:

1002, 1016, 1018, 1027, 1034, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022

0011.00--the following census blocks:

1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044,
 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072, 4073, 4074, 4075, 4076, 4077, 4078, 4081, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 5050, 5051, 5052, 5053, 5054, 5055, 5056, 5057, 5058, 5059, 5060, 5061, 5062, 5063, 5064, 5065, 5066, 5067, 5068, 5069, 5070, 5071, 5072, 5073, 5074, 5075, 5076, 5077, 5078, 5079, 5080, 5081, 5082, 5083, 5084, 5085, 5086, 5087, 5088, 5089, 5090, 5091, 5092, 5093, 5094, 5095, 5096, 5097, 5098, 5099, 5100, 5101, 5102, 5103, 5104, 5105, 5106, 5107, 5108, 5109, 5110, 5111, 5112, 5113, 5114, 5115, 5116, 5117, 5118, 5119, 5120, 5121, 5122, 5123, 5124, 5125, 5126, 5127, 5128, 5129, 5130, 5131, 5132, 5133, 5134,
 5135, 5136, 5137, 5138, 5139, 5140, 5141, 5142, 5143, 5144, 5145, 5146, 5147, 5148, 5149, 5150, 5151, 5152, 5153, 5154, 5155, 5156, 5157, 5158, 5159, 5160, 5161, 5162, 5163, 5164, 5166, 5167, 5168, 5169, 5170, 5171, 5172, 5173, 5174, 5175, 5176, 5177, 5178, 5179, 5180, 5181, 5182, 5183, 5184, 5185, 5186, 5187, 5188, 5189, 5190, 5191, 5192, 5193, 5194, 5195, 5196, 5197, 5198, 5199, 5200, 5201, 5202, 5203, 5204, 5205, 5206, 5207, 5208, 5209, 5210, 5211, 5212, 5215, 5216, 5217, 5218, 5219, 5220, 5221, 5222, 5223, 5224, 5225, 5226, 5227, 5228, 5229, 5230, 5231, 5232, 5233, 5235, 5236, 5239, 5240, 5241, 5242, 5243, 5244, 5245, 5246, 5247, 5248, 5249, 5250, 5251, 5252

SAN JOAQUIN

Whole Tracts in San Joaquin County

0001.01, 0006.00, 0007.00, 0016.00, 0017.00, 0018.00, 0019.00, 0020.00, 0021.00, 0022.01, 0022.02, 0023.00, 0024.01, 0024.02, 0028.00, 0051.27, 0051.29, 0051.30, 0055.03

Partial Tracts in San Joaquin County

0001.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025

0003.00--the following census blocks:

1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034,
 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041

0005.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032

0008.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1049, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1092, 1096, 1097

0008.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002,
 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

0015.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016

0025.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

0025.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007,
 1008

0027.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022

0027.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

0037.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2017, 3000,
 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032

0038.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 2015, 2016, 2024, 2026, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2035, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047,
 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077

0038.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1004, 2007, 2008

0050.04--the following census blocks:

1012, 1019

0051.06--the following census blocks:

1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1073, 1074, 1075, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025

0051.19--the
 following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016,
 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038

0051.22--the following census blocks:

3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032

0052.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1028, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125,
 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1166, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191

0055.02--the following census blocks:

1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1064, 1065, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1143, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043

STANISLAUS

Whole Tracts in Stanislaus County

0005.13, 0005.14, 0006.01, 0006.02, 0008.03, 0015.00, 0016.01, 0016.03, 0016.04, 0017.00, 0018.00, 0019.00, 0021.00, 0022.00, 0023.02, 0023.03, 0023.04, 0024.01, 0024.02, 0025.03, 0025.04, 0025.05, 0025.06, 0026.02, 0026.03, 0026.04, 0026.05, 0027.01, 0027.02, 0030.03, 0031.00, 0032.01, 0032.03, 0032.04, 0032.05, 0032.06, 0033.00, 0034.00, 0035.01, 0035.02, 0037.00, 0038.02, 0038.03, 0038.04, 0040.00

Partial Tracts in Stanislaus County

0008.07--the following census blocks:

2010, 2011, 2012

0010.02--the following census blocks:

3007, 3008, 3009

0012.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 3001, 3002, 3006, 3007, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046

0013.00--the following census blocks:

2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030

0014.00--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4012, 4013, 4014,
 4015, 4019, 4020, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010

0020.02--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047

0020.04--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009

0020.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014

0029.01--the following census blocks:

5032

0030.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005,
 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015

0030.04--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

0036.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029,
 3006, 3007, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3042, 3043, 3044, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053

0036.12--the following census blocks:

1016, 1017

0038.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028

0039.04--the following census
 blocks:

1029, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4020, 4021

0039.05--the following census blocks:

4011

0039.06--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

0039.07--the following census blocks:

4013, 4015

0039.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2003, 2004

0039.09--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1010, 1012, 1013, 2002, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21414.

Congressional District 14 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 14

ALAMEDA

Whole Tracts in Alameda County

4311.00, 4312.00, 4351.02, 4351.03, 4351.04, 4352.00, 4353.00, 4354.00, 4355.00, 4356.01, 4356.02, 4357.00, 4358.00, 4359.00, 4360.00, 4361.00, 4362.00, 4363.01, 4363.02, 4364.02, 4364.03, 4364.04, 4365.00, 4366.01, 4366.02, 4367.00, 4368.00, 4369.00, 4370.00, 4371.01, 4371.02, 4372.00, 4373.00, 4374.00, 4375.00, 4376.00, 4377.01, 4377.02, 4378.00, 4379.00, 4380.00, 4381.00, 4382.01, 4382.03, 4382.04, 4383.00, 4384.00, 4401.00, 4402.00, 4403.01, 4403.04, 4403.05, 4403.06, 4403.07, 4403.08, 4403.31, 4403.32, 4403.33, 4403.34,
 4403.36, 4403.37, 4403.38, 4411.00, 4412.00, 4413.01, 4413.02, 4414.01, 4414.02, 4415.01, 4415.21, 4415.22, 4415.23, 4417.02, 4418.00, 4419.21, 4419.23, 4419.24, 4419.26, 4419.27, 4419.28, 4419.29, 4420.00, 4421.00, 4422.00, 4423.01, 4423.02, 4424.00, 4425.01, 4425.02, 4426.01, 4426.02, 4430.01, 4501.01, 4501.02, 4502.00, 4503.00, 4504.00, 4505.01, 4506.01, 4506.03, 4506.04, 4506.05, 4506.06, 4506.07, 4506.08, 4506.09, 4507.01, 4507.41, 4507.42, 4507.43, 4507.44, 4507.45, 4507.46, 4507.50, 4507.51, 4507.52, 4511.02, 4511.03, 4511.04, 4512.01, 4512.02, 4513.00, 4514.01, 4514.03, 4514.04, 4515.01, 4515.03, 4515.04, 4515.05, 4515.06, 4516.01, 4516.02, 4517.01, 4517.03, 4517.04

Partial Tracts in Alameda County

4309.00--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006

4310.00--the following census blocks:

1001,
 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

4331.02--the following census blocks:

1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1031, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020

4332.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

4333.00--the following census blocks:

1009

4334.00--the following census blocks:

4010, 4011

4335.00--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012

4336.00--the following census blocks:

1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008

4338.02--the following census blocks:

2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014

4415.03--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4033, 4034, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071

4415.24--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2010, 2012, 2013,
 2014, 2015, 2016

4416.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

4416.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019

4417.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019,
 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009

4427.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008

4428.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017

4429.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001,
 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014

4430.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

4431.03--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3016

4431.04--the following census blocks:

2000, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010

4505.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001,
 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042

9900.00--the following census blocks:

0007, 0008, 0012, 0013, 0014, 0015

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21415.

Congressional District 15 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 15

SAN FRANCISCO

Whole Tracts in San Francisco County

0255.01, 0256.00, 0257.02, 0258.00, 0259.00, 0260.01, 0260.02, 0260.03, 0260.04, 0261.00, 0262.01, 0262.02, 0263.01, 0263.02, 0263.03, 0264.01, 0264.02, 0264.03, 0264.04, 0312.02, 0314.01, 0314.02, 0605.02, 9805.01

Partial Tracts in San Francisco County

0255.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002,
 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3010, 3011, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023

0257.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0312.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005

0313.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

0313.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

0610.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2009, 2010

SAN MATEO

Whole Tracts in San Mateo County

6001.00, 6002.00, 6003.00, 6004.01, 6004.02, 6005.01, 6005.02, 6006.00, 6007.01, 6007.02, 6008.00, 6009.00, 6010.00, 6011.00, 6012.00, 6013.01, 6013.02, 6014.00, 6015.01, 6015.02, 6016.01, 6016.03, 6016.04, 6016.05, 6017.00, 6018.00, 6019.01, 6019.02, 6020.01, 6020.02, 6021.00, 6022.01, 6022.02, 6023.00, 6024.00, 6025.00, 6026.01, 6026.02, 6037.00, 6038.01, 6038.02, 6039.00, 6040.00, 6041.02, 6041.03, 6041.04, 6042.00, 6044.00, 6045.00, 6046.00,
 6047.00, 6048.00, 6049.00, 6050.00, 6051.00, 6052.00, 6053.00, 6054.00, 6055.01, 6055.02, 6056.00, 6058.00, 6059.01, 6059.02, 6060.00, 6061.00, 6062.01, 6062.02, 6063.00, 6064.00, 6065.00, 6066.00, 6067.00, 6068.00, 6069.00, 6070.00, 6071.00, 6072.00, 6073.00, 6074.00, 6075.00, 6076.00, 6077.01, 6077.02, 6078.00, 6079.00, 6080.01, 6080.02, 6080.13, 6080.23, 6080.24, 6080.25, 6081.00, 6082.00, 6083.00, 6084.00, 6085.01, 6085.02, 6086.00, 6087.00, 6088.00, 6089.00, 6090.00, 6091.00, 6092.01, 6092.02, 6093.00, 6094.00, 6095.00, 6096.01, 6096.02, 6098.00, 6099.00, 6100.00, 6101.00, 6102.01, 6102.02, 6102.03, 6103.02, 6103.03, 6103.04, 6104.00, 6105.00, 6106.01, 6106.02, 6107.00, 6108.00, 6109.01, 6109.02, 6110.00, 6111.00, 6112.00, 6116.00, 6117.00, 6118.00, 6119.01, 6119.02, 6120.01, 6120.02, 6121.02, 6140.00, 9843.00

Partial Tracts in San Mateo County

6057.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023

6096.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008

6097.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049

6113.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1004, 1005, 1025, 2001, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2018, 2019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017

6115.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004

6121.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

6135.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2004, 2012, 2014

6139.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 4000, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4013, 4014, 4015

9901.00--the following census blocks:

0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011, 0012, 0013, 0014, 0015, 0016, 0017, 0018, 0019, 0020, 0021, 0022, 0023, 0024, 0025, 0026, 0027, 0034

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21416.

Congressional District 16 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 16

SAN MATEO

Whole Tracts in San Mateo County

6027.00, 6028.00, 6029.00, 6030.00, 6031.00, 6032.00, 6033.00, 6034.00, 6114.00, 6125.00, 6126.00, 6127.00, 6128.00, 6129.00, 6130.00, 6132.00, 6133.00, 6134.00, 6135.02, 6136.00, 6137.01, 6137.02, 6138.00

Partial Tracts in San Mateo County

6057.00--the following census blocks:

3020

6096.03--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1013

6097.00--the following census blocks:

1030, 1031

6113.00--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 3000, 3001, 3002, 4018

6115.00--the following census blocks:
